District of Columbia statutes.
2-1515.10

Repealer.

All organizational orders and parts of orders in conflict with any of the provisions of this title are repealed, except that any regulations adopted or promulgated by virtue of the authority granted by these orders shall remain in force until properly revised, amended, or repealed.

History

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-335, § 110, 52 DCR 2025

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 110 of Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services Establishment Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-657, December 29, 2004, 52 DCR 481).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 110 of Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-58, March 17, 2005, 52 DCR 3182).